Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2902
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Farm-to-School Program Act:

(1) Early childhood education program has the same meaning as in section 79-1101 and includes programs licensed under the Child Care Licensing Act;

(2) Food means an agricultural commodity or product, whether raw or processed, that is produced and marketed for human consumption;

(3) Program means the Nebraska farm-to-school program as established in section 79-2903; and

(4) School means (a) an elementary or secondary public school and (b) an elementary or secondary nonpublic school.

Laws 2021, LB396, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB758, § 1.

Child Care Licensing Act, see section 71-1908.